Missouri, session 2026, HB3152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.2299, to read as follows:
191.2299. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Honest Billing
Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Campus", the same meaning as in 42 CFR 413.65(a), as may be amended
from time to time;
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning as is ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Facility", the same meaning as is ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health care service", the same meaning as is ascribed to such term in
section 376.1350;
(5) "Health carrier" or "carrier", the same meaning as is ascribed to such term
in section 376.1350;
(6) "National provider identifier" or "NPI", the standard, unique health
identifier for health care providers that is issued by the National Plan and Provider
Enumeration System in accordance with 45 CFR Part 162;
(7) "Off-campus outpatient department of a facility", a location:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3152 2
(a) Whose operations are directly or indirectly owned or controlled by, in whole
or in part, or affiliated with, a hospital, regardless of whether the operations are under
the same governing body as the hospital;
(b) That is located more than two hundred fifty yards from the hospital's main
campus;
(c) That provides services that are organizationally and functionally integrated
with the hospital; and
(d) That is an outpatient facility providing preventive, diagnostic, treatment, or
emergency services.
3. Except as otherwise specified in this section, this section shall apply to all
facilities licensed and operating in this state and to all health carriers doing business in
this state. This section shall apply to claims submitted after December 31, 2026.
4. Irrespective of 45 CFR 162.410(a)(1), each off-campus outpatient department
of a facility shall apply for, obtain, and use, on all claims filed after the date specified in
subsection 3 of this section, for reimbursement or payment for health care services
provided in that department, a unique NPI that is distinct from the NPI used by the
main campus of the facility and any other off-campus location of the facility.
5. (1) No facility, or entity on behalf of a facility, shall, with respect to health
care services furnished to an enrollee at an off-campus outpatient department of a
facility, submit a claim for such health care services to a health carrier, or hold the
enrollee liable for such health care services, unless those health care services are billed
using the separate unique NPI established for the off-campus outpatient department
and on a CMS 1500 form or a HIPAA X12 837P electronic claims transaction or a
successor form or transaction.
(2) No health carrier shall be responsible to reimburse claims for health care
services furnished to an enrollee at an off-campus outpatient department of a facility if
such claims are not billed in accordance with this subsection.
6. A facility, or entity on behalf of a facility, that does not bill for health care
services rendered to an enrollee at an off-campus outpatient department of a facility in
accordance with this section shall not hold the enrollee liable to pay for the health care
services. A violation of this subsection shall constitute a violation of the Missouri
merchandising practices act, sections 407.010 to 407.130, subject to enforcement by the
attorney general.
7. A facility applying for a license or license renewal by the state shall
demonstrate that it has obtained one or more NPIs as required under this section as a
condition of receiving licensure, and shall use its unique NPI or NPIs on every claim for
payment in the manner required under this section.

HB 3152 3
8. The department of health and senior services may, in accordance with chapter
536, impose penalties on any licensee violating any of the provisions of this section by
taking any or all of the following actions, separately or in combination:
(1) Imposing an administrative fine of one thousand dollars for each violation of
this section;
(2) Recovering reasonable investigative fees and costs incurred as a consequence
of the violation or violations;
(3) Suspending, revoking, or denying the issuance or renewal of a license;
(4) Placing conditions on a license;
(5) Placing a licensee on probation;
(6) Referring a licensee to the attorney general for investigation; and
(7) Requiring the provider to post information about these penalties on the main
page of its website.
9. The director of the department of commerce and insurance shall have
authority to refer any violation of this section to the department of health and senior
services. The attorney general shall have authority to enforce the provisions of this
section.
10. The director of the department of commerce and insurance may promulgate
rules as necessary for the implementation of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated
in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔